Hawaii, session 2026, HB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $133,225,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fourth representative district, as follows: 1.   Kehena coastal recreational area Plans, land, design, construction, and equipment for the development of the Kehena coastal recreational area. Phase I:  Kehena beach access and parking.  Phase II: Four Kehena campground sites with ADA accessible tables and grills. Plans                            $1,000 Land                             $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $4,996,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                     $5,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the county of Hawaii. 2.   Kikala-Keokea park development Plans, land, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for the Kikala-Keokea park development. Plans                            $1,000 Land                             $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $4,996,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                     $5,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the county of Hawaii. 3.   Pahoa public library Construction for the Pahoa public library. Construction                $12,000,000 Total funding                    $12,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services. 4.   Pahoa public library Plans and design for Pahoa public library. Plans                           $10,000 Design                         $290,000 Total funding                       $300,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services. 5.   East Hawaii Central kitchen: farm-to-school Construction for building a central kitchen that would serve the east side of the county of Hawaii elementary, middle, and high schools. Construction                $50,000,000 Total funding                    $50,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 6.   Keone elementary school Construction and equipment and appurtenances for a new playground. Construction                   $200,000 Equipment                      $800,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 7.   Pahoa high and intermediate school Plans and constrcution for repairs to the gym roof. Plans                           $10,000 Construction                   $490,000 Total funding                       $500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 8.   O Makuu Ke Kahua Construction for a community center. Construction                $12,000,000 Total funding                    $12,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of Hawaiian home lands. 9.   Hawaiian paradise park community park Construction for a community park in Hawaiian Paradise Park. Construction                 $5,600,000 Total funding                     $5,600,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 10.  Isaac Hale beach park Construction for the development of Isaac Hale beach park. Construction                 $5,000,000 Total funding                     $5,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 11.  Pohoiki swim area Plans, design, and construction for a safe swim area in Pohoiki. Plans                          $250,000 Design                         $250,000 Construction                   $250,000 Total funding                       $750,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 12.  Albizia eradication near public roadways Construction and eradication of albizian trees near public roadways. Construction                 $5,000,000 Total funding                     $5,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 13.  Highway 130, Hawaii county Construction for the widening of highway 150 in Hawaii county. Construction                $30,000,000 Total funding                    $30,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 14.  Puna Makai Construction for an alternate route from Pahoa to Hilo. Construction                   $300,000 Total funding                       $300,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 15.  Albizia tree control Equipment and appurtenances for albizia tree control in the county of Hawaii. Equipment                      $500,000 Total funding                       $500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the Hawaii invasive species council. 16.  Wao Kele O Puna forest reserve Construction and equipment and appurtenances for the update of the Wao Kele O Puna forest reserve. Construction                   $150,000 Equipment                      $125,000 Total funding                       $275,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the office of Hawaiian affairs. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________